Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.010

Legislative declaration.

The legislature declares that:

(1) Marketing is a dynamic and changing part of Washington agriculture and a vital element in expanding the state economy;

(2) The sale in this state and export to other states and abroad of beer made in this state contribute substantial benefits to the economy of the state and provide a large number of jobs and sizeable tax revenues;

(3) The production of beer in this state is a new and important segment of Washington agriculture that has potential for greater contribution to the economy of the state if it undergoes continued development; and

(4) The general welfare of the people of this state will be served by continued development of the activities of the production of beer, that will improve the tax bases of local communities where agricultural land and processing facilities are located, and reduce the need for state and federal funding of local services. The industries are therefore affected with the public interest.

[ 2006 c 330 s 1.]